Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 13 Day Care Centers

Cross references. —

As to child-caring facilities generally, see §

14-4-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

See Editor's note to chapter 12.

§ 18-13-101.
Day care centers; funding or operation authorized.

As used in this section “day care center” means a facility established to provide care for children from families with special needs during normal working hours of the day to enable the parent or parents to pursue employment.

A board of county commissioners may establish a fund to promote, establish and maintain day care centers. The money may only be expended upon resolution for the establishment, promotion, maintenance and development of day care centers and may be paid to corporations or associations engaged in operating day care centers. A board of county commissioners may also be the governing authority of a day care center and appoint and supervise a board of directors to operate a day care center.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 50, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Children's day-care use as violation of restrictive covenant, 29 ALR4th 730.